src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-PstAct-deverbals_gt-norm.yaml
    звать+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: звавшийся
    зваться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: звавшийся
    назвать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: назвав
    назвать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: назвав
    назвать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: назвавши
    назвать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: назвавши
    назвать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: назвавший
    назвать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: назвавший
    рваться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: рвавшись
    рвать¹+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: рвавшийся
    рваться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: рвавшийся
    зарваться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: зарвавшись
    зарваться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: зарвавшийся
    выгрызть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: выгрызши
    выгрызть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: выгрызши
    выгрызть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выгрызший
    выгрызть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выгрызший
    лезть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: лезши
    лезть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: лезший
    слезть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: слезши
    слезть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: слезший
    сесть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: сев
    сесть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: севши
    сесть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: севший
    грызть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: грызши
    грызть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: грызши
    грызть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: грызший
    грызть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: грызший
    разгрызть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: разгрызши
    разгрызть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: разгрызши
    разгрызть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: разгрызший
    разгрызть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: разгрызший
    красть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: крав
    красть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: крав
    красть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: кравши
    красть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac+Use/Obs: кравши
    красть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: кравший
    красть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: кравший
    украсть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: украв
    украсть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: украв
    украсть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: укравши
    украсть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: укравши
    украсть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: укравший
    украсть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: укравший
    ползти+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: ползши
    ползти+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: ползший
    сползти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: сползши
    сползти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: сползший
    везти¹+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: вёзши
    везти¹+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: вёзший
    увезти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: увезя
    увезти+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: увезя
    увезти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: увёзший
    увезти+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: увёзший
    пасти+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: пасши
    пасти+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пасший
    спасти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: спасши
    спасти+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: спасши
    спасти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: спасший
    спасти+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: спасший
    нести+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: нёсши
    нести+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: нёсший
    внести+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: внеся
    внести+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: внеся
    внести+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: внёсший
    внести+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: внёсший
    блюсти+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: блюдши
    блюсти+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: блюдший
    соблюсти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: соблюдя
    соблюсти+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: соблюдя
    соблюсти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: соблюдший
    соблюсти+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: соблюдший
    вести+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: ведши
    вести+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: ведши
    вести+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: ведший
    вести+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: ведший
    отвести+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: отведя
    отвести+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: отведя
    отвести+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: отведший
    отвести+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: отведший
    мести+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: мётши
    мести+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: мётши
    мести+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: мётший
    мести+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Pass+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: мётшийся
    смести+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: сметя
    смести+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: сметя
    смести+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: смётший
    смести+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: смётший
    учесть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: учтя
    учесть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: учтя
    расти+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: росши
    расти+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: росший
    зарасти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: заросши
    зарасти+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: заросший
    грести+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: грёбши
    грести+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: грёбши
    грести+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: грёбший
    грести+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: грёбший
    сгрести+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: сгрёбши
    сгрести+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: сгрёбши
    сгрести+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: сгрёбший
    сгрести+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: сгрёбший
    красться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: кравшись
    красться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: кравшийся
    прокрасться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: прокравшись
    прокрасться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: прокравшийся
    выстричь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: выстригши
    выстричь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: выстригши
    выстричь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выстригший
    выстричь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: выстригший
    лечь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: лёгши
    лечь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: лёгший
    стричь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: стригши
    стричь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: стригши
    стричь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: стригший
    стричь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: стригший
    остричь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: остригши
    остричь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: остригши
    остричь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: остригший
    остричь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: остригший
    запрячь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: запрягши
    запрячь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: запрягши
    запрячь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: запрягший
    запрячь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: запрягший
    беречь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: берёгши
    беречь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: берёгши
    беречь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: берёгший
    беречь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: берёгший
    сберечь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: сберёгши
    сберечь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: сберёгши
    сберечь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: сберёгший
    сберечь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: сберёгший
    пренебречь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: пренебрегши
    пренебречь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пренебрегший
    изречь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: изрёкши
    изречь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: изрёкши
    изречь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: изрекший
    изречь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: изрекший
    волочь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: волокши
    волочь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: волокши
    волочь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: волокший
    волочь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: волокший
    уволочь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: уволокши
    уволочь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: уволокши
    уволочь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: уволокший
    уволочь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: уволокший
    печь²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: пёкши
    печь²+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: пёкши
    печь²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пёкший
    печь²+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пёкший
    печься+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: пёкшийся
    испечь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: испёкши
    испечь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: испёкши
    испечь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: испёкший
    испечь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: испёкший
    жечь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: жёгши
    жечь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: жёгши
    жечь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: жёгший
    жечь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: жёгший
    зажечь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: зажёгши
    зажечь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: зажёгши
    зажечь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: зажёгший
    зажечь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: зажёгший
    толочь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: толокши
    толочь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: толокши
    толочь+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: толокший
    толочь+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: толокший
    истолочь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: истолокши
    истолочь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: истолокши
    истолочь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: истолокший
    истолочь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: истолокший
    мочь²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: могши
    мочь²+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: могший
    превозмочь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: превозмогши
    превозмочь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: превозмогши
    превозмочь+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: превозмогший
    превозмочь+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: превозмогший
    беречься+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: берёгшись
    беречься+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: берёгшийся
    уберечься+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: уберёгшись
    уберечься+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: уберёгшийся
    вытереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: [ вытерши , вытерев ] # TODO not 1-to-1
    вытереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ вытерший, вытеревший ]
    тереть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: [ терев, тёрши ]
    тереть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: [ терев, тёрши ]
    тереть+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ теревший, тёрший ]
    тереть+V+Impf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ теревший, тёрший ]
    натереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: [ натерев, натёрши ]
    натереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: [ натерев, натёрши ]
    натереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ натеревший, натёрший ]
    натереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ натеревший, натёрший ]
    стереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: [ стерев, стёрши ]
    стереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: [ стерев, стёрши ]
    стереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ стеревший, стёрший ]
    стереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ стеревший, стёрший ]
    растереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: [ растерев, растёрши ]
    растереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: [ растерев, растёрши ]
    растереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ растеревший, растёрший ]
    растереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ растеревший, растёрший ]
    запереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: [ заперев, заперши ]
    запереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: [ заперев, заперши ]
    запереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: заперший
    запереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: заперший
    умереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: [ умерев, умерши ]
    умереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: умерший
    перемереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: [ перемерев, перемерши ]
    перемереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: перемерший
    опереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: [ оперев, опёрши ]
    опереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: [ оперев, опёрши ]
    опереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ оперевший, опёрший ]
    опереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ оперевший, опёрший ]
    отпереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: отперший
    отпереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: отперший
    отпереть+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: [ отперев, отперши ]
    отпереть+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: [ отперев, отперши ]
    запереться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: запёршись
    запереться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: запершийся
    опереться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: опёршись
    опереться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: опёршийся
    отпереться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: отпёршись
    отпереться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: отпершийся
    тереться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Fac: [ теревшись, тёршись ]
    тереться+V+Impf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ теревшийся, тёршийся ]
    натереться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: [ натеревшись, натёршись ]
    натереться+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+AnIn+Sg+Nom: [ натеревшийся, натёршийся ]
    выпороть²+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: выпоров
    выпороть²+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: выпоров
    выпороть¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: выпоров
    выпороть¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: выпоров
    выпороть²+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выпоровши
    выпороть²+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выпоровши
    выпороть¹+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выпоровши
    выпороть¹+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: выпоровши
